Utah statutes.
63M-1-3207.   Report to Legislature and the State Board of Education.

(1)  The board shall report the progress of the STEM Action Center, including the information described in Subsection (2), to the following groups once each year:

(a)  the Education Interim Committee;

(b)  the Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee; and

(c)  the State Board of Education.

(2)  The report described in Subsection (1) shall include information that demonstrates the effectiveness of the program, including:

(a)  the number of educators receiving professional development;

(b)  the number of students receiving services from the STEM Action Center;

(c)  a list of the providers selected pursuant to this part;

(d)  a report on the STEM Action Center's fulfilment of its duties described in Subsection 63M-1-3204; and

(e)  student performance of students participating in a STEM Action Center program as collected in Subsection 63M-1-3204(4).



Enacted by Chapter 336, 2013 General Session

